Maine, session 132, LD1694.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5219-CCC is enacted to read:
§5219-CCC. Working waterfront disaster mitigation tax credit
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Eligible property" means tangible property for which depreciation or amortization
in lieu of depreciation is allowable that is:
(1) Constructed, reconstructed or erected by the taxpayer; or
(2) Acquired by the taxpayer if the first use of such property commences with the
taxpayer.
B. "Qualifying working waterfront disaster mitigation project" means a project that:
(1) Is substantially designed in compliance with:
(a) In the case of a project placed in service before January 1, 2032, the 2021
International Building Code published by the International Code Council; or
(b) In the case of a project placed in service on or after January 1, 2032, the
most recent applicable International Code Council model code as long as that
code was published not later than 5 years before the date such project is placed
in service; and
(2) Is designed to prevent or mitigate damage to working waterfront property from
natural hazards using one or more of the following:
(a) The elevation of continuous foundation walls; the elevation of structures
on open foundations, such as piles, piers, posts or columns; the elevation of
structures on fill; the conversion of the 2nd story; and other methods involving
structural elevation as established by rule;
(b) Storm water management, including the construction, installation or
modification of culverts, drainage pipes, pumping stations, floodgates,
bioswales, detention and retention basins and other storm water management
facilities; flood diversion and storage measures; slope stabilization or grading
to direct flood waters away from businesses; flood protection measures for
water and sanitary sewer systems or other utility systems; vegetation
management for shoreline stabilization, including coastal, riverine, riparian
and other littoral zones; flood protection and stabilization measures for roads
and bridges; and such other flood risk reduction methods as determined by
rule;
(c) Reducing the risk to structures or infrastructure from erosion and
landslides, including through the installation of geosynthetics; surface and
subsurface drainage, stabilizing sod and vegetative buffer strips; preserving
mature vegetation; decreasing slope angles; stabilizing with riprap and other
means of slope anchoring; and other shoreline stabilization methods as
determined by rule;
Page 1 - 132LR0072(01)

(d) Creating a space that is protected by walls that are substantially
impermeable and resistant to flood loads, the use of materials and construction
techniques that are resistant to flood damage to minimize flood damage to
areas below the flood protection level of a structure;
(e) Changes made to an existing structure to reduce or eliminate the possibility
of damage to that structure from flooding, erosion, extreme temperatures, high
winds or other hazards; and
(f) Equipment and systems to warn residents of impending hazards, including
enhanced 9-1-1 services, as defined in Title 25, section 2921, subsection 6,
weather stations, rain gauges, flood alarms and such other warning systems as
determined by rule.
C. "Working waterfront property" means real property located in the State that is used
by the taxpayer to carry on an active trade or business that meets the gross receipts test
of subsection 2 and:
(1) Provides access to navigable waters to persons engaged in commercial fishing,
recreational fishing and boating, boat building, aquaculture, dredging or other
water-dependent activities; and
(2) Is used for or supports activities described in subparagraph (1).
2. Gross receipts test. A trade or business meets the gross receipts test for a taxable
year if the average annual gross receipts of that trade or business for a period of 3 taxable
years preceding a taxable year does not exceed $47,000,000. All trades or business of a
taxpayer that are treated as a single employer under Section 52(a) or Section 52(b) of the
Code or Section 414(m) or Section 414(o) of the Code must be treated as one trade or
business for purposes of this subsection.
3. Tax credit; limitation. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, a
taxpayer that undertakes a qualifying working waterfront disaster mitigation project is
allowed a tax credit against the tax otherwise due under this Part equal to 30% of cost of
that disaster mitigation project. The credit provided pursuant to this subsection may not
exceed $300,000.
4. Determination of taxable year. For purposes of this section, the qualified
investment for a taxable year is the basis of eligible property placed in service by the
taxpayer during the taxable year that is part of a qualifying working waterfront disaster
mitigation project.
5. Limitations; carry-forward. The credit allowed under subsection 3 may not
reduce the tax otherwise due under this Part to less than zero. Any unused portion of the
credit may be carried forward to the following year or years for a period not to exceed 10
years.
6. Relation to other tax credits. A taxpayer eligible for a credit pursuant to this
section may not claim a tax credit under this Part for the same or a similar project.
7. Inflation adjustment. Beginning in 2026, the limit on annual gross receipts
specified in subsection 2 and the total credit amount specified in subsection 3 must be
multiplied by the cost-of-living adjustment for taxable years beginning in the succeeding
calendar year. For purposes of this subsection, the "cost-of-living adjustment" is the
Page 2 - 132LR0072(01)

414 Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30th of the preceding
425 calendar year divided by the Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period
436 ending June 30, 2025 and "Chained Consumer Price Index" has the same meaning as in
447 section 5402, subsection 1. If the amount for subsection 2 as increased pursuant to this
458 subsection is not a multiple of $1,000,000, that amount must be rounded to the nearest
469 multiple of $1,000,000. If the amount for subsection 3 as increased pursuant to this
570 subsection is not a multiple of $1,000, that amount must be rounded to the nearest multiple
581 of $1,000.
8. Rules. The assessor may adopt rules to implement this section, including, but not
limited to, rules for determining and certifying eligibility and for determining what
additional projects designed to prevent or mitigate damage to working waterfront property
from natural hazards qualify. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.